hu: Kapcsoló elektromos pozíciói: 3 állású; 4 állású; Fényerőszabályzó tárcsa (fokozatmentes); Pillanatkapcsoló (visszatér a középállásba/kikapcsol); Pillanatnyilag ki (nyomásra bontó); Pillanatnyilag be (nyomásra záró); Ki-be (SPST); Be-ki-be (SPDT); Be-be (SPDT); Többállású forgókapcsoló; Egyéb
hr-HR: Preklopni električni položaji: 3 položaja; 4 položaja; Kotačić za zatamnjivanje (kontinuirani); Trenutno (povratak u sredinu / isključeno); Trenutno isključeno (push-to-break); Trenutno uključeno (push-to-make); Isključeno - Uključeno (SPST); Uključeno - Isključeno - Uključeno (SPDT); Uključeno - Uključeno (SPDT); Okretni s više položaja; Ostalo
it: Posizioni elettriche dell'interruttore: A 3 posizioni; A 4 posizioni; Rotella dimmer (continua); Momentaneo (ritorno al centro/off); Momentaneo off (premi per interrompere); Momentaneo on (premi per attivare); Off-On (SPST); On-Off-On (SPDT); On-On (SPDT); Rotativo multiposizione; Altro
cs: Elektrické polohy spínače: 3polohový; 4polohový; Stmívací kolečko (plynulé); Mžikové (návrat do středu / vypnuto); Mžikové vypnutí (rozpínací); Mžikové zapnutí (spínací); Vypnuto-Zapnuto (SPST); Zapnuto-Vypnuto-Zapnuto (SPDT); Zapnuto-Zapnuto (SPDT); Otočný vícepolohový; Jiné
nl: Schakelaar elektrische posities: 3-standen; 4-standen; Dimmerwiel (traploos); Terugverend (terug naar midden/uit); Terugverend uit (verbreekcontact); Terugverend aan (maakcontact); Uit-Aan (SPST); Aan-Uit-Aan (SPDT); Aan-Aan (SPDT); Draaischakelaar meerdere standen; Overig
sk-SK: Elektrické polohy prepínača: 3-polohový; 4-polohový; Koliesko na stmievanie (plynulé); Chvíľkové (návrat na stred/vypnuté); Chvíľkové vypnutie (stlačením sa preruší); Chvíľkové zapnutie (stlačením sa spojí); Vypnuté-Zapnuté (SPST); Zapnuté-Vypnuté-Zapnuté (SPDT); Zapnuté-Zapnuté (SPDT); Otočné viacpolohové; Iná
en: Switch electrical positions: 3-position; 4-position; Dimmer wheel (continuous); Momentary (return to center/off); Momentary Off (push-to-break); Momentary On (push-to-make); Off-On (SPST); On-Off-On (SPDT); On-On (SPDT); Rotary multi-position; Other
zh-TW: 開關電氣位置: 三段式; 四段式; 調光轉輪 (無段); 瞬時 (回正/關閉); 瞬時斷路 (按壓斷開); 瞬時通電 (按壓接通); 關-開 (單刀單擲); 開-關-開 (單刀雙擲); 開-開 (單刀雙擲); 多段旋轉式; 其他
th: สลับตำแหน่งทางไฟฟ้า: 3 ตำแหน่ง; 4 ตำแหน่ง; สวิตช์หรี่ไฟแบบล้อหมุน (ต่อเนื่อง); ชั่วขณะ (กลับไปที่ตรงกลาง/ปิด); ดับชั่วขณะ (แบบกดดับปล่อยติด); ติดชั่วขณะ (แบบกดติดปล่อยดับ); ปิด-เปิด (SPST); เปิด-ปิด-เปิด (SPDT); เปิด-เปิด (SPDT); หมุนได้หลายตำแหน่ง; อื่นๆ
tr: Anahtar elektriksel konumları: 3 konumlu; 4 konumlu; Dimmer kadranı (sürekli); Anlık (ortaya/kapalı konuma dönme); Anlık Kapalı (bas-bırak); Anlık Açık (bas-çalıştır); Kapalı-Açık (SPST); Açık-Kapalı-Açık (SPDT); Açık-Açık (SPDT); Döner çok konumlu; Diğer
sl-SI: Električni položaj stikala: 3-položajno; 4-položajno; Kolesce za zatemnitev (zvezno); Trenutno (vrnitev v sredino/izklop); Trenutni izklop (pritisni za prekinitev); Trenutni vklop (pritisni za vklop); Izklop-vklop (SPST); Vklop-izklop-vklop (SPDT); Vklop-vklop (SPDT); Rotacijsko večpoložajno; Drugo
da: Elektriske positioner for kontakt: 3-positioners; 4-positioners; Lysdæmperhjul (kontinuerligt); Momentan (returner til midte/fra); Momentan fra (tryk for at afbryde); Momentan til (tryk for at slutte); Fra-til (SPST); Til-fra-til (SPDT); Til-til (SPDT); Drejelig med flere positioner; Andet
bg-BG: Електрически позиции на превключвателя: 3-позиционен; 4-позиционен; Въртящ се димер (безстепенен); Моментен (връщане в центъра/изключено); Моментно изключване (натисни за прекъсване); Моментно включване (натисни за свързване); Изкл.-Вкл. (SPST); Вкл.-Изкл.-Вкл. (SPDT); Вкл.-Вкл. (SPDT); Въртящ се многопозиционен; Друго
de: Schaltpositionen: 3-Positionen; 4-Positionen; Dimmerrad (stufenlos); Momentan (Rückkehr zur Mitte/Aus); Momentan Aus (Öffner); Momentan Ein (Schließer); Aus-Ein (SPST); Ein-Aus-Ein (SPDT); Ein-Ein (SPDT); Drehschalter (Mehrere Positionen); Sonstige
nb: Bytt elektriske posisjoner: 3 posisjoner; 4-posisjons; Dimmehjul (trinnløst); Momentan (går tilbake til senter/av); Momentan av (trykk-for-å-bryte); Momentan på (trykk-for-å-koble); Av/på (SPST); På/av/på (SPDT); På/på (SPDT); Roterende flerposisjon; Annet
ro-RO: Pozițiile electrice ale comutatorului: 3 poziții; 4 poziții; Rotiță variator (continuu); Momentan (revenire la centru/oprit); Oprit momentan (apăsare pentru întrerupere); Pornit momentan (apăsare pentru contact); Oprit-Pornit (SPST); Pornit-Oprit-Pornit (SPDT); Pornit-Pornit (SPDT); Rotativ cu mai multe poziții; Altele
pt-BR: Interruptor posições elétricas: 3 posições; 4 posições; Botão dimmer (contínuo); Momentâneo (retorna ao centro/desligado); Desligamento momentâneo (push-to-break); Ligação momentânea (push-to-make); Liga-Desliga (SPST); Liga-Desliga-Liga (SPDT); Liga-Liga (SPDT); Rotativo multiposição; Outro
zh-CN: 开关电气档位: 3 档; 4 档; 调光轮（无级连续）; 瞬时（返回中心/关闭）; 瞬时关（按断式）; 瞬时开（按通式）; 关-开 (SPST); 开-关-开 (SPDT); 开-开 (SPDT); 旋转多档式; 其他
fr: Positions électriques de l’interrupteur: 3 positions; 4 positions; Molette de gradation (continue); Momentané (retour au centre/arrêt); Arrêt momentané (pousser pour couper); Marche momentanée (pousser pour établir); Arrêt-marche (SPST); Marche-arrêt-marche (SPDT); Marche-marche (SPDT); Rotatif à plusieurs positions; Autre
el: Ηλεκτρικές θέσεις διακόπτη: 3 θέσεων; 4 θέσεων; Ροδέλα ροοστάτη (συνεχόμενη); Στιγμιαίο (επαναφορά στο κέντρο/απενεργοποίηση); Στιγμιαίο κλείσιμο (πάτημα για διακοπή); Στιγμιαίο άνοιγμα (πάτημα για σύνδεση); Off-On (SPST); On-Off-On (SPDT); On-On (SPDT); Περιστροφικό πολλών θέσεων; Άλλο
pl: Przełącz pozycje elektryczne: 3-pozycyjny; 4-pozycyjny; Pokrętło ściemniacza (płynne); Chwilowy (powrót do środka/wyłączenia); Chwilowy wyłączony (wciśnij, aby rozłączyć); Chwilowy włączony (wciśnij, aby załączyć); Wyłącz-włącz (SPST); Włącz-wyłącz-włącz (SPDT); Włącz-włącz (SPDT); Obrotowy wielopozycyjny; Inne
ja: スイッチ接点位置: 3ポジション; 4ポジション; ディマーホイール (連続); モーメンタリ (センター/オフに戻る); モーメンタリオフ (プッシュ・トゥ・ブレーク); モーメンタリオン (プッシュ・トゥ・メイク); オフ-オン (SPST); オン-オフ-オン (SPDT); オン-オン (SPDT); ロータリーマルチポジション; その他
lt-LT: Jungiklio elektrinių padėčių skaičius: 3 padėčių; 4 padėčių; Tolygiai reguliuojamas ratukas; Trumpalaikis (grįžta į centrą / išjungta); Trumpalaikio išjungimo (nuspaudus nutraukiama); Trumpalaikio įjungimo (nuspaudus sujungiama); Išjungta–įjungta (SPST); Įjungta–išjungta–įjungta (SPDT); Įjungta–įjungta (SPDT); Sukamas kelių padėčių; Kita
sv: Brytarens elektriska lägen: 3-läges; 4-läges; Dimmerhjul (steglös); Momentan (återfjädrar till mitten/av); Momentan av (brytande); Momentan på (slutande); Av-på (SPST); På-av-på (SPDT); På-på (SPDT); Roterande flerläges; Annan
ru: Электрические положения переключателя: 3 положения; 4 положения; Колесико диммера (плавное); Без фиксации (возврат в центр/выкл.); Без фиксации, выкл. (нажать для размыкания); Без фиксации, вкл. (нажать для замыкания); Выкл.-Вкл. (SPST); Вкл.-Выкл.-Вкл. (SPDT); Вкл.-Вкл. (SPDT); Поворотный многопозиционный; Другое
es: Posiciones eléctricas del interruptor: 3 posiciones; 4 posiciones; Rueda atenuadora (continua); Momentáneo (retorno al centro/apagado); Apagado momentáneo (pulsar para abrir); Encendido momentáneo (pulsar para cerrar); Apagado-encendido (SPST); Encendido-apagado-encendido (SPDT); Encendido-encendido (SPDT); Giratorio de múltiples posiciones; Otra
pt-PT: Posições elétricas do interruptor: 3 posições; 4 posições; Roda reguladora de intensidade (contínuo); Momentâneo (regresso ao centro/desligar); Desligamento momentâneo (premir para quebrar); Ligamento momentâneo (premir para ligar); Desligar-Ligar (SPST); Ligar-Desligar-Ligar (SPDT); Ligar-Ligar (SPDT); Rotativo com várias posições; Outro
ko: 스위치 전기적 위치: 3단; 4단; 디머 휠(연속형); 모멘터리(중앙 복귀/오프); 모멘터리 오프(푸시 투 브레이크); 모멘터리 온(푸시 투 메이크); 오프-온(SPST); 온-오프-온(SPDT); 온-온(SPDT); 로터리 다단; 기타
vi: Công tắc vị trí điện: 3 vị trí; 4 vị trí; Bánh xe điều chỉnh độ sáng (liên tục); Tạm thời (trở về giữa/tắt); Tạm tắt (nhấn để ngắt mạch); Tạm bật (nhấn để đóng mạch); Tắt-bật (SPST); Bật-tắt-bật (SPDT); Bật-bật (SPDT); Xoay nhiều vị trí; Khác
fi: Kytkimen asennot: 3-asentoinen; 4-asentoinen; Himmenninpyörä (portaaton); Hetkellinen (palautuu keskelle / pois päältä); Hetkellisesti pois (painamalla avautuva); Hetkellisesti päällä (painamalla sulkeutuva); Pois-Päällä (SPST); Päällä-Pois-Päällä (SPDT); Päällä-Päällä (SPDT); Pyörivä moniasentoinen; Muu